California statutes. Business and Professions Code
Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict, expand, alter, or modify the existing scope of practice of, a nurse anesthetist and is declaratory of existing law and advisory opinion, including, but not limited to, California Society of Anesthesiologists v. Brown (2012) 204 Cal.App.4th 390.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 169, Sec. 5.   (AB 876)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Nurse Practitioners [2834. - 2837.]

2834.

The Legislature finds that various and conflicting definitions of the nurse practitioner are being created by state agencies and private organizations within California. The Legislature also finds that the public is harmed by conflicting usage of the title of nurse practitioner and lack of correspondence between use of the title and qualifications of the registered nurse using the title. Therefore, the Legislature finds the public interest served by determination of the legitimate use of the title “nurse practitioner” by registered nurses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

2835.

No person shall advertise or hold himself out as a “nurse practitioner” who is not a nurse licensed under this chapter and does not, in addition, meet the standards for a nurse practitioner established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------

2835.5.

On and after January 1, 2008, an applicant for initial qualification or certification as a nurse practitioner under this article who has not been qualified or certified as a nurse practitioner in California or any other state shall meet the following requirements:

(a) Hold a valid and active registered nursing license issued under this chapter.

(b) Possess a master’s degree in nursing, a master’s degree in a clinical field related to nursing, or a graduate degree in nursing.

(c) Satisfactorily complete a nurse practitioner program approved by the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 31.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2835.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in addition to any other practices that meet the general criteria set forth in statute or regulation for inclusion in standardized procedures developed through collaboration among administrators and health professionals, including physicians and surgeons and nurses, pursuant to Section 2725, standardized procedures may be implemented that authorize a nurse practitioner to do any of the following:(1) Order durable medical equipment, subject to any limitations set forth in the standardized procedures. Notwithstanding that authority, nothing in this paragraph shall operate to limit the ability of a third-party payer to require prior approval.

(2) After performance of a physical
 examination by the nurse practitioner and collaboration with a physician and surgeon, certify disability pursuant to Section 2708 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) For individuals receiving home health services or personal care services, after consultation with the treating physician and surgeon, approve, sign, modify, or add to a plan of treatment or plan of care.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the validity of any standardized procedures in effect prior to the enactment of this section or those adopted subsequent to enactment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 34.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.

(a) The board shall establish categories of nurse practitioners and standards for nurses to hold themselves out as nurse practitioners in each category. The standards shall take into account the types of advanced levels of nursing practice that are or may be performed and the clinical and didactic education, as outlined in the nurse practitioner curriculum core competencies specified in the National Organization of Nurse Practitioner Faculties’ Nurse Practitioner Role Core Competencies (2022), or a successor approved by the board, experience, or both, needed to practice safely at those levels. In setting the standards, the board shall consult with nurse practitioners, physicians and surgeons with expertise in the nurse practitioner field, and health care organizations using nurse
 practitioners. Established standards shall apply to persons without regard to the date of meeting the standards. If the board sets standards for use of nurse practitioner titles that include completion of an academically affiliated program, it shall provide equivalent standards for registered nurses who have not completed the program.

(b) Any regulations promulgated by a state department that affect the scope of practice of a nurse practitioner shall be developed in consultation with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 50.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.1.

Neither this chapter nor any other provision of law shall be construed to prohibit a nurse practitioner from furnishing or ordering drugs or devices when all of the following apply:

(a) The drugs or devices are furnished or ordered by a nurse practitioner in accordance with standardized procedures or protocols developed by the nurse practitioner and the supervising physician and surgeon when the drugs or devices furnished or ordered are consistent with the practitioner’s educational preparation or for which clinical competency has been established and maintained.

(b) The nurse practitioner is functioning pursuant to standardized procedure, as defined by Section 2725, or protocol. The standardized procedure or protocol
 shall be developed and approved by the supervising physician and surgeon, the nurse practitioner, and the facility administrator or the designee.

(c) (1) The standardized procedure or protocol covering the furnishing of drugs or devices shall specify which nurse practitioners may furnish or order drugs or devices, which drugs or devices may be furnished or ordered, under what circumstances, the extent of physician and surgeon supervision, the method of periodic review of the nurse practitioner’s competence, including peer review, and review of the provisions of the standardized procedure.

(2) In addition to the requirements in paragraph (1), for Schedule II controlled substance protocols, the provision for furnishing Schedule II controlled substances shall address the diagnosis of the illness, injury, or condition for which the Schedule II controlled
 substance is to be furnished.

(d) The furnishing or ordering of drugs or devices by a nurse practitioner occurs under physician and surgeon supervision. Physician and surgeon supervision shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the physician, but does include (1) collaboration on the development of the standardized procedure, (2) approval of the standardized procedure, and (3) availability by telephonic contact at the time of patient examination by the nurse practitioner.

(e) For purposes of this section, no physician and surgeon shall supervise more than four nurse practitioners at one time.

(f) (1) Drugs or devices furnished or ordered by a nurse practitioner may include Schedule II through Schedule V controlled substances under the California Uniform Controlled Substances
 Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code) and shall be further limited to those drugs agreed upon by the nurse practitioner and physician and surgeon and specified in the standardized procedure.

(2) When Schedule II or III controlled substances, as defined in Sections 11055 and 11056, respectively, of the Health and Safety Code, are furnished or ordered by a nurse practitioner, the controlled substances shall be furnished or ordered in accordance with a patient-specific protocol approved by the treating or supervising physician. A copy of the section of the nurse practitioner’s standardized procedure relating to controlled substances shall be provided, upon request, to any licensed pharmacist who dispenses drugs or devices, when there is uncertainty about the nurse practitioner furnishing the order.

(g) (1) The board has
 certified in accordance with Section 2836.3 that the nurse practitioner has satisfactorily completed a course in pharmacology covering the drugs or devices to be furnished or ordered under this section.

(2) A physician and surgeon may determine the extent of supervision necessary pursuant to this section in the furnishing or ordering of drugs and devices.

(3) Nurse practitioners who are certified by the board and hold an active furnishing number, who are authorized through standardized procedures or protocols to furnish Schedule II controlled substances, and who are registered with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration, shall complete, as part of their continuing education requirements, a course including Schedule II controlled substances, and the risks of addiction associated with their use, based on the standards developed by the board. The board shall establish the
 requirements for satisfactory completion of this subdivision.

(h) Use of the term “furnishing” in this section, in health facilities defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall include (1) the ordering of a drug or device in accordance with the standardized procedure and (2) transmitting an order of a supervising physician and surgeon.

(i) “Drug order” or “order” for purposes of this section means an order for medication which is dispensed to or for an ultimate user, issued by a nurse practitioner as an individual practitioner, within the meaning of Section 1306.02 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, (1) a drug order issued pursuant to this section shall be treated in the same manner as a prescription of the supervising physician; (2) all references to “prescription” in this code and the Health and Safety
 Code shall include drug orders issued by nurse practitioners; and (3) the signature of a nurse practitioner on a drug order issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed to be the signature of a prescriber for purposes of this code and the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 693, Sec. 8.   (SB 1109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.2.

Furnishing or ordering of drugs or devices by nurse practitioners is defined to mean the act of making a pharmaceutical agent or agents available to the patient in strict accordance with a standardized procedure. All nurse practitioners who are authorized pursuant to Section 2836.1 to furnish or issue drug orders for controlled substances shall register with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 350, Sec. 20.   (SB 943)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.3.

(a) The furnishing of drugs or devices by nurse practitioners is conditional on issuance by the board of a number to the nurse applicant who has successfully completed the requirements of subdivision (g) of Section 2836.1. The board may issue a furnishing number upon initial application and, if approved by the board, the applicant shall not be required to make a separate application. The number shall be included on all transmittals of orders for drugs or devices by the nurse practitioner. The board shall make the list of numbers issued available to the Board of Pharmacy. The board may charge the applicant a fee to cover all necessary costs to implement this section, that shall be not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for an initial application, nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for an application for
 renewal. The board may charge a penalty fee for failure to renew a furnishing number within the prescribed time that shall be not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b) The number shall be renewable at the time of the applicant’s registered nurse license renewal.

(c) The board may revoke, suspend, or deny issuance of the numbers for incompetence or gross negligence in the performance of functions specified in Sections 2836.1 and 2836.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 18.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.4.

Neither this chapter nor any other provision of law shall be construed to prohibit a nurse practitioner from furnishing or ordering buprenorphine when done in compliance with the provisions of the Comprehensive Addiction Recovery Act (Public Law 114-198), as enacted on July 22, 2016, including the following:

(a) The requirement that the nurse practitioner complete not fewer than 24 hours of initial training provided by an organization listed in sub-subclause (aa) of subclause (II) of clause (iv) of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 823 of Title 21 of the United States Code, or any other organization that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines is appropriate for the purposes of that sub-subclause, that addresses the following:

(1) Opioid maintenance and detoxification.

(2) Appropriate clinical use of all drugs approved by the Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of opioid use disorder.

(3) Initial and periodic patient assessments, including substance use monitoring.

(4) Individualized treatment planning, overdose reversal, and relapse prevention.

(5) Counseling and recovery support services.

(6) Staffing roles and considerations.

(7) Diversion control.

(8) Other best practices, as identified by the United States Secretary of Health
 and Human Services.

(b) The alternative requirement that the nurse practitioner have other training or experience that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services determines will demonstrate the ability of the nurse practitioner to treat and manage opiate-dependent patients.

(c) The requirement that the nurse practitioner be supervised by, or work in collaboration with, a licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (SB 554)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2836.5.

In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in infection-associated chronic conditions, including, but not limited to, long COVID, as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, myalgic encephalomyelitis, and dysautonomia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 433, Sec. 3.   (AB 3119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the current scope of practice of a registered nurse authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 439.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Advanced Practice Registered Nurses [2837.100. - 2837.105.]

2837.100.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements under this article shall not be an undue or unnecessary burden to licensure or practice. The requirements are intended to ensure the new category of licensed nurse practitioners has the least restrictive amount of education, training, and testing necessary to ensure competent practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 265, Sec. 4.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.101.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Nurse Practitioner Advisory Committee.

(b) “Standardized procedures” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 2725.

(c) “Transition to practice” means additional clinical experience and mentorship provided to prepare a nurse practitioner to practice independently. “Transition to practice” includes, but is not limited to, managing a panel of patients, working in a complex health care setting, interpersonal communication, interpersonal collaboration and
 team-based care, professionalism, and business management of a practice. The board shall, by regulation, define minimum standards for transition to practice. For purposes of the transition to practice:

(1) Clinical experience shall not be limited to experience in a single category that a nurse practitioner may practice in pursuant to Section 2836.

(2) Clinical experience may include experience obtained before January 1, 2021, but clinical experience obtained before a person is certified by the board as a nurse practitioner shall not be included.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 9.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.102.

(a) The board shall establish a Nurse Practitioner Advisory Committee to advise and make recommendations to the board on all matters relating to nurse practitioners, including, but not limited to, education, appropriate standard of care, and other matters specified by the board. The committee shall provide recommendations or guidance to the board when the board is considering disciplinary action against a nurse practitioner.

(b) The
 committee shall consist of four qualified nurse practitioners, two physicians and surgeons with demonstrated experience working with nurse practitioners, and one public member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 265, Sec. 4.   (AB 890)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.103.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a nurse practitioner may perform the functions specified in subdivision (c) pursuant to that subdivision, in a setting or organization specified in paragraph (2) pursuant to that paragraph, if the nurse practitioner has successfully satisfied the following requirements:

(A) Passed a national nurse practitioner board certification examination and, if applicable, any supplemental examination developed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.105.

(B) Holds a certification as a nurse practitioner from a national certifying body accredited by the
 National Commission for Certifying Agencies or the American Board of Nursing Specialties and recognized by the board.

(C) Provides documentation that educational training was consistent with standards established by the board pursuant to Section 2836 and any applicable regulations as they specifically relate to requirements for clinical practice hours. Online educational programs that do not include mandatory clinical hours shall not meet this requirement.

(D) Has completed a transition to practice in California of a minimum of three full-time equivalent years of practice or 4600 hours. A nurse practitioner who has been practicing as a nurse practitioner in direct patient care for a minimum of three full-time equivalent years or 4,600 hours within the last five years, as
 indicated on the application, may be deemed to have satisfied this requirement. For purposes of this subparagraph:

(i) Proof of completion of one transition to practice shall be provided to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, as an attestation from either a licensed physician and surgeon, a certified nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to this section, or a certified nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.104.

(ii) A licensed physician and surgeon or a certified nurse practitioner who attests to the completion of a transition to practice is not required to specialize in the same category as the applicant pursuant to Section 2836.

(iii) A licensed physician and surgeon or a certified nurse practitioner
 practicing pursuant to this section or Section 2837.104 who attests to the completion of a transition to practice is not required to verify competence, clinical expertise, or any other standards related to the practice of the applicant and shall only attest to the completion of the transition to practice, as defined in Section 2837.101.

(iv) A licensed physician and surgeon or a certified nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to this section or Section 2837.104 who attests to the completion of a transition to practice shall not be subject to civil, criminal, administrative, disciplinary, employment, credentialing, professional discipline, contractual liability, or medical staff action, sanction, or penalty or other liability for providing an attestation or refusing to provide an attestation pursuant to this section unless the attestation was
 produced fraudulently.

(2) A nurse practitioner who meets all of the requirements of paragraph (1) may practice, including, but not limited to, performing the functions authorized pursuant to subdivision (c), in one of the following settings or organizations in which one or more physicians and surgeons practice with the nurse practitioner without standardized procedures:

(A) A clinic, as defined in Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the following:

(i) A correctional treatment center, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 1250 of the Health
 and Safety Code.

(ii) A state hospital, as defined in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(C) A facility described in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) A medical group practice, including a professional medical corporation, as defined in Section 2406, another form of corporation controlled by physicians and surgeons, a medical partnership, a medical foundation exempt from licensure, or another lawfully organized group of physicians and surgeons that provides health care services.

(E) A home health agency, as defined in Section 1727 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) A hospice facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1745) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) In health care agencies that have governing bodies, as defined in Division 5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, including, but not limited to, Sections 70701 and 70703 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, the following apply:

(A) A nurse practitioner shall adhere to all applicable bylaws.

(B) A nurse practitioner shall be eligible to serve on medical staff and hospital committees.

(C) A nurse practitioner shall be eligible to attend
 meetings of the department to which the nurse practitioner is assigned. A nurse practitioner shall not vote at department, division, or other meetings unless the vote is regarding the determination of nurse practitioner privileges with the organization, peer review of nurse practitioner clinical practice, whether a licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by a hospital pursuant to Section 2401, or the vote is otherwise allowed by the applicable bylaws.

(b) An entity described in subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a nurse practitioner functioning pursuant to this section in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.

(c) In addition to any other practices authorized by law, a nurse practitioner who meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may perform the following functions without standardized procedures in accordance with their education and training:

(1) Conduct an advanced assessment.

(2) (A) Order, perform, and interpret diagnostic procedures.

(B) For radiologic procedures, a nurse practitioner can order diagnostic procedures and utilize the findings or results in treating the patient. A nurse practitioner may perform or interpret clinical laboratory procedures that they are permitted to perform under Section 1206 and under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Act
 (CLIA).

(3) Establish primary and differential diagnoses.

(4) Prescribe, order, administer, dispense, procure, and furnish therapeutic measures, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Diagnose, prescribe, and institute therapy or referrals of patients to health care agencies, health care providers, and community resources.

(B) Prescribe, administer, dispense, and furnish pharmacological agents, including over-the-counter, legend, and controlled substances.

(C) Plan and initiate a therapeutic regimen that includes ordering and prescribing nonpharmacological interventions, including, but not
 limited to, durable medical equipment, medical devices, nutrition, blood and blood products, and diagnostic and supportive services, including, but not limited to, home health care, hospice, and physical and occupational therapy.

(5) After performing a physical examination, certify disability pursuant to Section 2708 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(6) Delegate tasks to a medical assistant pursuant to Sections 1206.5, 2069, 2070, and 2071, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1366) of Chapter 3 of Division 13 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) A nurse practitioner practicing under this section and not working under standardized procedures shall inform all new patients in a language understandable
 to the patient that a nurse practitioner is not a physician and surgeon.

(e) A nurse practitioner shall not be required to tell a patient the patient has a right to see a physician and surgeon.

(f) A nurse practitioner practicing under this section and not working under standardized procedures shall post a notice in a conspicuous location accessible to public view that the nurse practitioner is regulated by the Board of Registered Nursing. The notice shall include the board’s telephone number and the internet website where the nurse practitioner’s license may be checked and complaints against the nurse practitioner may be made.

(g) A nurse practitioner shall refer a patient to a physician and surgeon or other licensed
 health care provider if a situation or condition of a patient is beyond the scope of the education and training of the nurse practitioner.

(h) A nurse practitioner practicing under this section shall have professional liability insurance appropriate for the practice setting.

(i) Any health care setting operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is exempt from this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 10.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.103.5.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103, the authority for a nurse practitioner to prescribe, order, dispense, procure, and furnish pharmacological agents pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2837.103 is conditional on all of the following:

(1) The issuance of a furnishing number by the board pursuant to Section 2836.3.

(2) If prescribing, ordering, dispensing, procuring, or furnishing controlled substances, registration with the United States Drug Enforcement Administration.

(3) If prescribing, ordering, dispensing, procuring, or furnishing
 Schedule II controlled substances, as part of their continuing education requirements, completion of a course including Schedule II controlled substances, and the risks of addiction associated with their use, based on the standards developed by the board. The board shall establish the requirements for satisfactory completion of this paragraph.

(b) This section shall not be construed to require a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Sections 2837.103 or 2837.104 to practice under standardized procedures or physician supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 19.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.104.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2023, notwithstanding any other law, the following apply to a nurse practitioner who holds an active certification issued by the board pursuant to subdivision (b):

(1) The nurse practitioner may perform the functions specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2837.103 pursuant to that subdivision outside of the settings or organizations specified under subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103.

(2) Subject to subdivision (g) and any applicable conflict of interest policies of the bylaws, the nurse practitioner shall be eligible for membership
 of an organized medical staff.

(3) Subject to subdivision (g) and any applicable conflict of interest policies of the bylaws, a nurse practitioner member may vote at meetings of the department to which nurse practitioners are assigned.

(b) The board shall issue a certificate to perform the functions specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2837.103 pursuant to that subdivision outside of the settings and organizations specified under subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103, if the nurse practitioner satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) Meets all of the requirements specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103.

(2) Holds a valid and active license as a registered nurse in California and a master’s degree in nursing or in a clinical field related to nursing or a doctoral degree in nursing.

(3) Has practiced as a nurse practitioner in good standing for at least three years, not inclusive of the transition to practice required pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103. The board may, at its discretion, lower this requirement for a nurse practitioner holding a Doctorate of Nursing Practice degree (DNP) based on practice experience gained in the course of doctoral education experience.

(c) A nurse practitioner authorized to practice pursuant to this section shall comply with all of the
 following:

(1) The nurse practitioner, consistent with applicable standards of care, shall not practice beyond the scope of their clinical and professional education and training, including specific areas of concentration and shall only practice within the limits of their knowledge and experience and national certification.

(2) The nurse practitioner shall consult and collaborate with other healing arts providers based on the clinical condition of the patient to whom health care is provided. Physician consultation shall be obtained as specified in the individual protocols and under the following circumstances:

(A) Emergent conditions requiring prompt medical intervention after initial stabilizing care has been started.

(B) Problem which is not resolving as anticipated after an ongoing evaluation and management of the situation.

(C) History, physical, or lab findings inconsistent with the clinical perspective.

(D) Upon request of patient.

(3) Nurse practitioner consultation with a physician and surgeon alone shall not create a physician-patient relationship. The nurse practitioner shall be solely responsible for the services they provide.

(4) The nurse practitioner shall establish a plan for referral of complex medical cases and emergencies to a physician and surgeon or other appropriate healing arts providers. The nurse
 practitioner shall have an identified referral plan specific to the practice area, that includes specific referral criteria. The referral plan shall address the following:

(A) Whenever situations arise which go beyond the competence, scope of practice, or experience of the nurse practitioner.

(B) Whenever patient conditions fail to respond or the patient is acutely decompensating in a manner that is not consistent with the progression of the disease and corresponding treatment plan.

(C) Any patient with a rare condition.

(D) Any patient conditions that do not fit the commonly accepted diagnostic pattern for a disease or disorder.

(E) All emergency situations after initial stabilizing care has been started.

(d) A nurse practitioner practicing under this section and not working under standardized procedures shall inform all new patients in a language understandable to the patient that a nurse practitioner is not a physician and surgeon.

(e) A nurse practitioner practicing under this section and not working under standardized procedures shall not be required by the board to tell a patient that the patient has a right to see a physician and surgeon. 

(f) A nurse practitioner practicing under this section and not working under standardized procedures shall post a notice in a conspicuous
 location accessible to public view that the nurse practitioner is regulated by the Board of Registered Nursing. The notice shall include the board’s telephone number and internet website where the nurse practitioner’s license may be checked and complaints against the nurse practitioner may be made.

(g) A nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to this section shall maintain professional liability insurance appropriate for the practice setting.

(h) For purposes of this section, corporations and other artificial legal entities shall have no professional rights, privileges, or powers.

(i) Subdivision (h) shall not apply to a nurse practitioner if either of the following applies:

(1) The certificate issued pursuant to this section is inactive, surrendered, revoked, or otherwise restricted by the board.

(2) The nurse practitioner is employed pursuant to the exemptions under Section 2401.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 11.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2837.105.

(a) (1) The board shall request the department’s Office of Professional Examination Services, or an equivalent organization, to perform an occupational analysis of nurse practitioners performing the functions specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2837.103 pursuant to that subdivision.

(2) The board, together with the Office of Professional Examination Services, shall assess the alignment of the competencies tested in the national nurse practitioner certification examination required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103 with the occupational analysis performed according to paragraph (1). This paragraph shall not apply
 to a national nurse practitioner certification examination discontinued before January 1, 2017.

(3) The occupational analysis shall be completed by January 1, 2023.

(4) If the assessment performed according to paragraph (2) identifies additional competencies necessary to perform the functions specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2837.103 pursuant to that subdivision that are not sufficiently validated by the national nurse practitioner board certification examination required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2837.103, the board shall identify and develop a supplemental exam that properly validates identified competencies.

(b) The examination process shall be regularly reviewed pursuant
 to Section 139.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 12.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Clinical Nurse Specialists [2838. - 2838.4.]

2838.

No person shall advertise or hold himself or herself out as a “clinical nurse specialist” unless he or she is a nurse licensed under this chapter, and meets the standards for a clinical nurse specialist established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 159, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Section operative July 1, 1998, pursuant to Section 2838.3.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.1.

(a) On and after July 1, 1998, any registered nurse who holds themselves out as a clinical nurse specialist or who desires to hold themselves out as a clinical nurse specialist shall, within the time prescribed by the board and before their next license renewal or the issuance of an initial license, submit their education, experience, and other credentials, and any other information required by the board to determine that the person qualifies to use the title “clinical nurse specialist.”

(b) Upon finding that a person is qualified to hold themselves out as a clinical nurse specialist, the board shall appropriately indicate on the license issued or renewed that the person is qualified to use the title “clinical nurse
 specialist.” The board shall also issue to each qualified person a certificate indicating that the person is qualified to use the title “clinical nurse specialist.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 51.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.2.

(a) A clinical nurse specialist is a registered nurse with advanced education, who participates in expert clinical practice, education, research, consultation, and clinical leadership as the major components of their role.

(b) The board may establish categories of clinical nurse specialists and the standards required to be met for nurses to hold themselves out as clinical nurse specialists in each category. The standards shall take into account the types of advanced levels of nursing practice that are or may be performed and the clinical and didactic education, experience, or both needed to practice safety at those levels. In setting the standards, the board shall consult with clinical nurse specialists, physicians and surgeons appointed by the Medical Board of
 California with expertise with clinical nurse specialists, and health care organizations that use clinical nurse specialists.

(c) A registered nurse who meets one of the following requirements may apply to become a clinical nurse specialist:

(1) Possession of a master’s degree in a clinical field of nursing.

(2) Possession of a master’s degree in a clinical field related to nursing with coursework in the components referred to in subdivision (a).

(3) On or before July 1, 1998, meets the following requirements:

(A) Current licensure as a registered nurse.

(B) Performs the role of a clinical nurse specialist as described in
 subdivision (a).

(C) Meets any other criteria established by the board.

(d) (1) A nonrefundable fee of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), but not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall be paid by a registered nurse applying to be a clinical nurse specialist for the evaluation of their qualifications to use the title “clinical nurse specialist.”

(2) The fee to be paid for a temporary certificate to practice as a clinical nurse specialist shall be not less than thirty dollars ($30) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

(3) A biennial renewal fee shall be paid upon submission of an application to renew the clinical nurse specialist certificate and shall be established by the board at no less than one hundred
 fifty dollars ($150) and no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(4) The penalty fee for failure to renew a certificate within the prescribed time shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not less than seventy-five dollars ($75) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(5) The fees authorized by this subdivision shall not exceed the amount necessary to cover the costs to the board to administer this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 52.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2838.3.

This article shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 159, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Note: This section prescribed a delayed operative date for Article 9, commencing with Section 2838.)